North Carolina, session 2025, HB527.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) to provide a directed grant
to the Town of Swansboro for road maintenance.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H527-v-1*